Hawaii statutes.
§490:7-303 Diversion; reconsignment; change
of instructions. (a) Unless the bill of lading otherwise provides, a
carrier may deliver the goods to a person or destination other than that stated
in the bill or may otherwise dispose of the goods, without liability for
misdelivery, on instructions from:

(1) The holder of a negotiable bill;

(2) The consignor on a nonnegotiable bill, even if
the consignee has given contrary instructions;

(3) The consignee on a nonnegotiable bill in the
absence of contrary instructions from the consignor, if the goods have arrived
at the billed destination or if the consignee is in possession of the tangible
bill or in control of the electronic bill; or

(4) The consignee on a nonnegotiable bill, if the
consignee is entitled as against the consignor to dispose of the goods.

(b) Unless instructions described in
subsection (a) are included in a negotiable bill of lading, a person to which
the bill is duly negotiated may hold the bailee according to the original
terms. [L 2004, c 163, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next